Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299A.625] MINNESOTA CLEARANCE GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section "nonfatal shooting clearance rate" means the rate at which a law enforcement agency cleared by arrest or cleared by exceptional means a nonfatal shooting offense. For purposes of this definition: new text end new text begin (1) "cleared by arrest" means that a law enforcement agency has arrested at least one person as an offender, charged the person with the commission of an offense, and referred the person to the court for prosecution; and new text end new text begin (2) "cleared by exceptional means" means that a law enforcement agency has identified at least one person as an offender; gathered enough evidence to support an arrest, make a charge, and refer the person to the court for prosecution; identified the person's exact location for the person to be taken into custody immediately; and encountered a circumstance outside the control of the law enforcement agency that prohibits the agency from arresting, charging, and referring the person for prosecution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must establish the Minnesota clearance grant program to award grants to law enforcement agencies to reduce violent crime by increasing the solve rate of crimes that involve the nonfatal shooting of a firearm. The purpose of the program is to improve law enforcement strategies and initiatives aimed at increasing nonfatal shooting clearance rates and engagement and support for victims of violent crime. The program recognizes that nonfatal shooting offenses often involve multiple jurisdictions and encourages interagency cooperative efforts to maximize information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application; grant awards. new text end new text begin (a) Applicants must submit an application in the form and manner established by the commissioner. In awarding a grant, the commissioner must give priority to a law enforcement agency: new text end new text begin (1) with high rates of unsolved nonfatal shootings and inadequate staffing to investigate these crimes; new text end new text begin (2) that develops a plan to partner with other law enforcement agencies to maximize interagency information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise; new text end new text begin (3) that demonstrates a commitment to working with other government agencies to improve clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (4) that details a process for evaluating the effectiveness of both investigators and investigative units, including but not limited to the development of specific goals and performance metrics. new text end new text begin (b) Distribution of state funds or technical assistance are by contractual arrangement between the commissioner and each recipient law enforcement agency. Terms of the contract are negotiable each year. The state auditor must periodically audit all law enforcement agencies receiving state grants. Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement agency from receiving federal or local grants if grants become available. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of grants. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency awarded a grant under this section must use the grant award: new text end new text begin (1) to improve investigatory resources, including but not limited to the hiring of personnel assigned to investigate nonfatal shooting crimes or collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (2) for overtime for investigators and support staff; new text end new text begin (3) to develop evidence-based policies, procedures, and training; new text end new text begin (4) for technical assistance; new text end new text begin (5) for law enforcement equipment or technology, including but not limited to investigative, evidence-processing, or forensic-testing equipment or technology; new text end new text begin (6) for information systems, with prioritization for projects that would improve data integration and the ability to share information across and between law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys' offices, and crime laboratories; new text end new text begin (7) for hiring and retention of victim-witness coordinators; and new text end new text begin (8) to partner with hospital-based violence intervention programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency that receives a grant under this section must submit annually to the commissioner a report on activities carried out to reduce violent crime and improve nonfatal shooting clearance rates during the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) the number of investigations initiated, the number of nonfatal shootings cleared, the demographics of victims and offenders, and the impact on the nonfatal shooting clearance rates in the jurisdiction where investigations were initiated; new text end new text begin (2) the number of personnel hired or assigned to investigate nonfatal shootings, disaggregated between sworn law enforcement officers and civilian or unsworn professional staff; new text end new text begin (3) the number of personnel hired or assigned to collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (4) the number of personnel hired or assigned to provide victim services; new text end new text begin (5) the description of any training developed or implemented; new text end new text begin (6) the description of any new technology purchased or acquired; new text end new text begin (7) how grant-funded activities have impacted clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (8) the record management system, or equivalent, used to collect case information and the system's ability to integrate with the record management systems of other agencies, prosecuting attorney offices, and crime laboratories. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA CLEARANCE GRANTS.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Minnesota clearance grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.625. new text end